ko: 과육 색상: 녹색; 주황색; 분홍색; 빨간색; 흰색; 노란색; 기타
th: สีเนื้อ: สีเขียว; สีส้ม; สีชมพู; สีแดง; สีขาว; สีเหลือง; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 果肉颜色: 绿色; 橙色; 粉红色; 红色; 白色; 黄色; 其他
ru: Цвет мякоти: Зеленый; Оранжевый; Розовый; Красный; Белый; Желтый; Другое
fi: Hedelmälihan väri: Vihreä; Oranssi; Vaaleanpunainen; Punainen; Valkoinen; Keltainen; Muu
da: Frugtkødets farve: Grøn; Orange; Pink; Rød; Hvid; Gul; Andet
el: Χρώμα σάρκας: Πράσινο; Πορτοκαλί; Ροζ; Κόκκινο; Λευκό; Κίτρινο; Άλλο
de: Farbe des Fruchtfleischs: Grün; Orange; Rosa; Rot; Weiß; Gelb; Sonstiges
nl: Vruchtvleeskleur: Groen; Oranje; Roze; Rood; Wit; Geel; Overige
nb: Kjøttfarge: Grønn; Oransje; Rosa; Rød; Hvit; Gul; Annen
en: Flesh color: Green; Orange; Pink; Red; White; Yellow; Other
hr-HR: Boja mesa: Zelena; Narančasta; Ružičasta; Crvena; Bijela; Žuta; Ostalo
vi: Màu thịt quả: Màu xanh lá cây; Màu cam; Màu hồng; Màu đỏ; Màu trắng; Màu vàng; Khác
bg-BG: Цвят на месестата част: Зелен; Оранжев; Розов; Червен; Бял; Жълт; Друго
ro-RO: Culoarea pulpei (miezului).: Verde; Portocaliu; Roz; Roșu; Alb; Galben; Altele
ja: 肌色: 緑; オレンジ; ピンク; 赤; 白; 黄色; その他
sk-SK: Telesná farba: Zelená; Oranžová; Ružová; Červená; Biela; Žltá; Iné
pt-PT: Carne cor: Verde; Laranja; Rosa; Vermelho; Branco; Amarelo; Outro
es: Color de la pulpa: Verde; Naranja; Rosa; Rojo; Blanco; Amarillo; Otro
tr: Ten rengi: Yeşil; Turuncu; Pembe; Kırmızı; Beyaz; Sarı; Diğer
cs: Barva dužniny: Zelená; Oranžová; Růžová; Červená; Bílá; Žlutá; Ostatní
sl-SI: Barva mesa: Zelena; Oranžna; Rožnata; Rdeča; Bela; Rumena; Drugo
fr: Couleur de la chair: Vert; Orange; Rose; Rouge; Blanc; Jaune; Autre
it: Color carne: Verde; Arancione; Rosa; Rosso; Bianco; Giallo; Altro
lt-LT: Minkštimo spalva: Žalia; Oranžinė; Rožinė; Raudona; Balta; Geltona; Kita
zh-TW: 果肉顏色: 綠色; 橙色; 粉紅色; 紅色; 白色; 黃色; 其他
hu: Hús színe: Zöld; Narancssárga; Rózsaszín; Piros; Fehér; Sárga; Egyéb
pt-BR: Cor da polpa: Verde; Laranja; Rosa; Vermelho; Branco; Amarelo; Outro
pl: Kolor ciała: Zielony; Pomarańczowy; Różowy; Czerwony; Biały; Żółty; Inny
sv: Köttfärg: Grön; Orange; Rosa; Röd; Vit; Gul; Övrigt